Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-615] Primary care provider;
advanced practice registered nurse. (a) Each policy of insurance
delivered or issued for delivery in this State by a mutual benefit society
shall recognize advanced practice registered nurses, as defined under section
457-8.5(a), as participating providers, and shall include coverage for care
provided by participating advanced practice registered nurses practicing within
the scope of their licenses for purposes of health maintenance, diagnosis, or
treatment, to the extent that the policy provides benefits for identical
services rendered by another health care provider.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, an insurer may recognize a participating advanced practice registered
nurse as a primary care provider if the insured's policy requires the selection
of a primary care provider. The insurer shall include participating advanced
practice registered nurses who practice as primary care providers on any
publicly available list of participating primary care providers; provided that
the insurer retains the right to determine the contracting criteria for a
participating primary care provider.

(c) For the purposes of this section,
"participating advanced practice registered nurse" means an advanced
practice registered nurse who has contracted with the insurer to provide health
care services to its insureds. [L 2009, c 169, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next